Illinois, session 104th, HB4260.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 5Practices Act is amended by adding Section 2MMMM as follows: 6    (815 ILCS 505/2MMMM new)7    Sec. 2MMMM. Hospital services advertising.8    (a) As used in this Section:9    "Hospital" means a hospital licensed under the Hospital 10Licensing Act or a hospital organized under the University of 11Illinois Hospital Act.12    "Telehealth services" has the meaning given to that term 13in the Telehealth Act.14    (b) Every hospital must advertise what services it 15provides. Every hospital providing telehealth services must 16specify that those services are provided via telehealth. Every 17hospital must make clearly available on its website 18information about what services it provides and what services 19are provided via telehealth.20    (c) A person who violates this Section commits an unlawful 21practice within the meaning of this Act.